Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-1202
Tax; levy; person liable; due and payable; lien.

A tax is hereby levied on all uranium severed from the soil of this state. Such tax shall be paid by the person engaged in the severing of such uranium, shall become due and payable monthly, and shall operate as a first lien on all such uranium. Such lien shall follow the resource into the hands of third persons, whether the resource is acquired in good faith or bad faith or is in a manufactured or unmanufactured state.

Laws 1983, LB 356, § 14.